South Dakota, session 2026, HB1081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 16-13:
A licensed health care provider who is providing medical care to a pregnant woman
or an individual with a serious medical condition is exempt from jury duty if, within ten
days of receiving a summons for jury duty, the provider submits to the clerk of court a
written request for exemption and written documentation stating:
(1) No equally qualified individual is available to fulfill the provider's job duties; and
(2) The provider's absence from medical practice may, with regard to the provider's
patient:
(a) Result in hardship to the patient;
(b) Complicate or inhibit the patient's access to required medical care;
(c) Result in the patient experiencing uncontrolled pain;
(d) Result in the worsening of the patient's disease processes; or
(e) Potentially result in the death of the patient.
For the purposes of this section, "licensed health care provider" means a licensed
physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, nurse anesthetist, or nurse midwife.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 16-13:
A public safety worker is exempt from jury duty if, within ten days of receiving a
summons for jury duty, the worker submits to the clerk of court a written request for
exemption and written documentation stating:
(1) No equally qualified individual is available to fulfill the worker's job duties; and
(2) The worker's absence from regular job duties may pose a risk to the health and
safety of the public.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.689.12 2 1081
For the purposes of this section, "public safety worker" means a law enforcement
officer as defined by § 23-3-27, firefighter, hazardous and disaster response team
member, or emergency medical service personnel.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 16-13:
An individual is exempt from jury duty if, within ten days of receiving a summons
for jury duty, the individual submits to the clerk of court a written request for exemption
and written documentation stating:
(1) The requesting individual is solely responsible for the daily care of another
individual with a permanent disability;
(2) The individual with a permanent disability lives in the requesting individual's
household; and
(3) The performance of jury service by the requesting individual would result in
substantial risk of injury to the health of the individual with a permanent disability.
This section does not apply to an individual who is regularly employed at a location
other than the person's household.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 16-13:
In addition to the notice required by § 16-13-34, the clerk of courts shall notify a
juror of the specific date on which the juror is required to physically appear before the
court for jury service on a grand or petit jury, at least fourteen days prior to that date.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.